Idaho, session 2025, H0259.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The Legislature finds that
the State of Idaho has a substantial interest in preserving the integrity of
the electoral process by combating voter confusion. Preventing voter con-
fusion is crucial in facilitating secure elections because it directly im-
pacts voter confidence, voter participation, and the overall integrity of
the electoral process.
The Legislature further finds that when voters clearly understand the
voting process and the information presented to them, they are more likely
to trust the election outcomes. This trust is foundational for the perceived
legitimacy of elected officials and the democratic system as a whole. Re-
quiring the disclosure of party affiliation in the publication or distribu-
tion of political statements will help voters understand the information be-
ing presented to them in such statements as it will provide helpful context
to assist them in processing the information they receive. Such party affil-
iation information is already required to be indicated on the declaration of
candidacy forms for candidates running in partisan elections. The disclo-
sure of party affiliation in political statements is a continuation of dis-
closure and transparency requirements already implemented in other areas of
the electoral process.
The Legislature further finds that requiring party affiliation disclo-
sure will assist in preventing voting errors such as selecting the wrong can-
didate or improperly marking a ballot. If voters are informed of the party
affiliation of a candidate or of the political committee sponsoring a polit-
ical statement, they will be less likely to vote for a candidate or measure
that does not align with their values because the information they received
lacked this valuable information. Reducing such errors ensures that votes
are accurately cast and counted, reflecting the true will of the electorate.
The Legislature further finds that requiring party affiliation disclo-
sure will assist in mitigating the impact of misinformation. Providing ac-
curate and easily understandable information about the person publishing or
distributing political statements, including such person's party affilia-
tion, will assist in counteracting the effects of misinformation and dis-
information. When voters are well-informed, they are less susceptible to
false narratives that could influence their voting decisions or discourage
them from voting altogether.
The Legislature further finds that clear and accurate communication
concerning persons or entities publishing or distributing political state-


ments reduces the burden on election officials by decreasing the number of
voter inquiries and the need for corrective measures. This efficiency al-
lows officials to focus on maintaining security protocols and managing the
election process effectively.
The Legislature further finds that voter confusion can lead to uninten-
tional disenfranchisement of voters, where voters are unable to success-
fully cast their ballots due to misunderstandings. Ensuring clarity in all
election-related political statements helps protect the voting rights of
all citizens.
It is therefore the intent of the Legislature, in order to facilitate
the foregoing interests, to require any person who makes an expenditure for
the financing of the publication or distribution of political statements
to disclose with such statement the political affiliation of such person
if such person is affiliated with a political party, and, if the political
statement is in support of a candidate, the party affiliation of the candi-
date.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6614A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6614A. PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF POLITICAL STATEMENTS. When-
ever any person makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing communica-
tions expressly advocating the election, approval or defeat of a candidate,
measure or person standing for election to the position of precinct commit-
teeman through any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, website, mo-
bile application, text message, outdoor advertising facility, direct mail-
ing, yard sign, bumper sticker, pamphlet, display card, poster, billboard,
campaign button, or any other type of general public political advertising,
the person responsible for such communication shall be clearly indicated on
such communication as well as such person's political party affiliation, if
any, and if the political statement is in support of a candidate the party af-
filiation of the candidate, if any.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.